kab1/kab.aff
SET UTF-8
TRY abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzčǧḥɣṛṣṭɛẓABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZČǦḤƔṚṢṬƐẒ-

REP 2

REP gh ɣ
REP kh x
REP dh ḍ
REP dj ǧ

#FLAG long


#addad amaruz n wasuf amalay...

PFX A Y 1
PFX A a u a #a->u

PFX B Y 1
PFX B a wu a #a->wu

PFX C Y 1
PFX C a we a #a->we






CIRCUMFIX X

#unti
PFX F Y 1
PFX F 0 t/X [a]

SFX G Y 1
SFX G 0 t/FX .

###unti asget

PFX H Y 1
PFX H a ti/X a

SFX I Y 1
SFX I 0 in/HX .


###addad amaruz n usget unti
PFX Q Y 1
PFX Q a te/X a

SFX R Y 1
SFX R 0 in/QX .


###asget amalay
PFX K Y 1
PFX K a i/X a

SFX L Y 1
SFX L 0 en/KX .




##
###addad amaruz n usget amalay
PFX M Y 1
PFX M a yi/X a


PFX O Y 1
PFX O a ye/X a

SFX P Y 1
SFX P 0 en/MOX .
##

## Imyagen efk, els...
PFX a Y 1
PFX a e 0/X e


SFX b Y 10
SFX b 0 et/aX .
SFX b 0 emt/aX .
SFX b 0 eɣ/aX .
SFX b 0 en/aX .
SFX b 0 ent/aX .
SFX b 0 iɣ/aX .
SFX b 0 an/aX .
SFX b 0 ant/aX .
SFX b 0 in/aX .
SFX b 0 int/aX .

PFX c Y 1
PFX c e te/X e

SFX d Y 10
SFX d 0 eḍ/cX .
SFX d 0 em/cX .
SFX d 0 emt/cX .
SFX d 0 iḍ/cX .
SFX d 0 a/cX .
SFX d 0 am/cX .
SFX d 0 amt/cX .
SFX d 0 i/cX .
SFX d 0 im/cX .
SFX d 0 imt/cX .


PFX e Y 2
PFX e e ye e
PFX e e ne e

PFX g Y 1
PFX g e ye/X e

PFX i Y 1
PFX i e ne/X e

SFX h Y 2
SFX h 0 a/gciX .
SFX h 0 i/gciX .
